Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-968
Riparian Vegetation
Management Task Force; duties; meetings; final
report; expenses.

The Riparian Vegetation Management
Task Force, in consultation with appropriate federal agencies, shall develop
and prioritize vegetation management goals and objectives, analyze the cost-effectiveness
of available vegetation treatment, and develop plans and policies to achieve
such goals and objectives. Any plan shall utilize the principles of integrated
vegetation management and sound science. The task force shall convene within
thirty days after the appointment of the members is complete to elect a chairperson
and conduct such other business as deemed necessary. The efforts of the task
force shall be initially directed toward river basins designated by the Department
of Natural Resources as fully appropriated or overappropriated. Task force
meetings shall be held in communities within the Republican River and Platte
River basins with a final report
due to the Governor and the
Legislature prior to June 30, 2013. It is the intent of
the Legislature that expenses of the task force not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per fiscal year.
This section terminates on June 30, 2013.

Laws 2007, LB701, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB98, § 4.
June 30, 2013